Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-363
Physical injury, defined.

Physical injury shall mean damage to bodily tissue caused by nontherapeutic conduct, including, but not limited to, fractures, bruises, lacerations, internal injuries, or dislocations, and shall include, but not be limited to, physical pain, illness, or impairment of physical function.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 16.